Mississippi statutes. Title 53. Oil, Gas, and Other Minerals
In General
§ 53-1-39.
Appeals to the chancery court; pending cases in circuit court.

In addition to other remedies now available, the state, or any interested person aggrieved by any final rule, regulation or order of the board, shall have the right, regardless of the amount involved, of appeal to the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, or to the chancery court of the county in which all or a part of appellant’s property affected by such rule, regulation or order is situated, which shall be taken and perfected as hereinafter provided, within thirty (30) days from the date that such final rule, regulation or order is filed for record in the office of the board; and the said chancery court may affirm such rule, regulation or order, or reverse same for further proceedings as justice may require. All such appeals shall be taken and perfected, heard and determined either in termtime or in vacation on the record, including a transcript of pleadings and testimony, both oral and documentary, filed and heard before the board, and such appeal shall be heard and disposed of promptly by the court as a preference cause. In perfecting any appeal provided by this section, the provisions of law respecting notice to the reporter and the allowance of bills of exception, now or hereafter in force respecting appeals from the chancery court to Supreme Court shall be applicable. However, the reporter shall transcribe his notes and file the transcript of the record with the board within thirty (30) days after approval of the appeal bond.

Upon the filing with the board of a petition for appeal to the chancery court, it shall be the duty of the board, as promptly as possible, and in any event within sixty (60) days after approval of the appeal bond, to file with the clerk of the chancery court to which the appeal is taken, a copy of the petition for appeal and of the rule, regulation or order appealed from, and the original and one (1) copy of the transcript of the record of proceedings in evidence before the board. After the filing of said petition, the appeal shall be perfected by the filing with the clerk of the chancery court to which the appeal is taken of bond in the sum of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) with two (2) sureties or with a surety company qualified to do business in Mississippi as the surety, conditioned to pay the cost of such appeal; said bond to be approved by any member of the board or by the supervisor, or by the clerk of the court to which such appeal is taken. The perfection of an appeal shall not stay or suspend the operation of any rule, regulation or order of the board, but the judge of the chancery court to which the appeal is taken may award a writ of supersedeas to any rule, regulation or order of the board after five (5) days’ notice to the board and after hearing. Any order or judgment staying the operation of any rule, regulation or order of the board shall contain a specific finding, based upon evidence submitted to the chancery judge and identified by reference thereto, that great or irreparable damage would result to the appellant if he is denied relief, and the stay shall not become effective until a supersedeas bond shall have been executed and filed with and approved by the clerk of the court or the chancery judge, payable to the state. The bond shall be in an amount fixed by the chancery judge and conditioned as said chancery judge may direct in the order granting the supersedeas.

Appeals of rules, regulations or orders of the board pending in the circuit court prior to July 1, 1988, shall proceed in the circuit court having jurisdiction under the appropriate statutes and rules applicable to such cases in the circuit courts. Appeals of rules, regulations or orders of the board on or after July 1, 1988, shall be perfected in the appropriate chancery court and shall proceed under the statutes and rules applicable to such cases in the chancery courts.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-24; Laws, 1948, ch. 256, § 12a, b; Laws, 1958, ch. 185, § 2a, b; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 20; amd, Laws, 1984, ch. 380, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 431, § 3; Reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 357, § 20; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 340, § 20, eff from and after passage (approved March 11, 1991).

§ 53-1-41.
Restraining orders, injunctions against board.

No temporary restraining order or injunction of any kind shall be granted against the board, or against any agent, employee or representative of said board restraining the board, or any of its agents, employees or representatives, from enforcing any statute of this state relating to conservation of oil and gas, or any of the provisions of Sections 53-1-1 through 53-1-47, inclusive, and Sections 53-3-1 through 53-3-21, inclusive, or any rule, regulation or order made thereunder, except after due notice to said board, and to all other defendants, and after a hearing at which it shall be clearly shown to the court that the act done or threatened is without sanction of law, or that the provision of law, or the rule, regulation or order complained of, is invalid, and that, if enforced against the complainant, will cause an irreparable injury. With respect to any order or decree granting temporary injunctive relief, the nature and extent of the probable invalidity of the statute, or of any provision of the aforesaid sections, or of any rule, regulation or order thereunder involved in such suit, must be recited in the order or decree granting the temporary relief, as well as a clear statement of the probable damage relied upon by the court as justifying temporary injunctive relief.

No temporary injunction, or temporary restraining order of any kind against the board, or its agents, employees or representatives, shall become effective until the complainant shall execute a bond in such amount and upon such conditions as the court may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-25; Laws, 1948, ch. 256, § 12c, d; Laws, 1958, ch. 185, § 2c, d; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 21; Reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 357, § 21; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 340, § 21, eff from and after passage (approved March 11, 1991).

§ 53-1-43.
Suits to restrain violations or threatened violations; lien remedy.

Whenever it shall appear that any person is violating or threatening to violate any statute of this state with respect to the conservation of oil and gas, or any provision of Sections 53-1-1 through 53-1-47, inclusive, and Sections 53-3-1 through 53-3-21, inclusive, or any rule, regulation or order made by the board thereunder, and fails or refuses to cease such violation or threats of violation on notice so to do, by the board or supervisor, the board may bring suit against such person in the chancery court in the county of the residence of the defendant, or in the county of the residence of any defendant, if there be more than one (1) defendant, or in the county where the violation is alleged to have occurred or is threatened, to restrain such person from continuing such violation or from carrying out the threat of violation. In such suit the board may obtain injunctions, prohibitory and mandatory, including temporary restraining orders and preliminary injunctions, as the facts may warrant, including, when appropriate, an injunction restraining any person from moving or disposing of any illegal oil, illegal gas, illegal condensate, or illegal product.

In the event the board should fail to bring suit within ten (10) days to enjoin any actual or threatened violation of any statute of this state with respect to the conservation of oil and gas, or of any provision of Sections 53-1-1 through 53-1-47, inclusive, and Sections 53-3-1 through 53-3-21, inclusive, or of any rule, regulation or order made thereunder, then any person or party in interest adversely affected by such violation, and who has notified the board in writing of such violation, or threat thereof, and has requested the board to sue, may, to prevent any or further violation, bring suit for that purpose in the chancery court of any county in which the board could have brought suit, and the board shall be made a party to such suit.

The board may utilize the provisions of Section 85-7-132, Mississippi Code of 1972, in prosecuting violations of Sections 53-1-1 through 53-1-47 and Sections 53-3-1 through 53-3-21, or any rule, regulation or order made by the board thereunder.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-26; Laws, 1948, ch. 256, § 13; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 22; Reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 357, § 22. Reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 340, § 22; Laws, 1997, ch. 482, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 27, 1997).

§ 53-1-45.
Appeals to Supreme Court.

An appeal may be taken, in accordance with the General Laws of the State of Mississippi relating to appeals, from any judgment of the circuit court or decree of any chancery court in any appeal proceeding brought under authority of this section; and such appeal, when docketed in the Supreme Court, shall be placed on the preference docket of such court, and may be advanced as such court may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-27; Laws, 1948, ch. 256, § 14; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 23; Reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 357, § 23; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 340, § 23, eff from and after passage (approved March 11, 1991).

§ 53-1-47.
Penalty for violations.

(i) Any person, who, for the purpose of evading the provisions of Sections 53-1-1 through 53-1-47, inclusive, or any rule, regulation or order made thereunder, shall make or cause to be made any false entry, statement of fact or omission in any report required by such sections or by any rule, regulation or order thereunder or in any account, record or memorandum kept in connection with the provisions thereof or who, for such purpose, shall mutilate, alter, conceal or falsify any such report, account, record or memorandum, shall be subject to a penalty of not more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) per day for each day of such violation to be assessed by the board. In determining the amount of the penalty, the board shall consider the factors specified in subsection (d) of this section. Such penalties shall be assessed according to the procedures set forth in subsection (b) of this section.

Any person, who, for the purpose of evading the provisions of Sections 53-1-1 through 53-1-47, inclusive, or any rule, regulation or order made thereunder, shall intentionally make or cause to be made any false entry, statement of fact or omission in any report required by said sections or by any rule, regulation or order thereunder or in any account, record or memorandum kept in connection with the provisions thereof or who, for such purpose, shall mutilate, alter, conceal or falsify any such report, account, record or memorandum shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be subject, upon conviction in any court of competent jurisdiction, to a fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or imprisonment for a term of not less than ten (10) days nor more than six (6) months for each such violation, or both such fine and imprisonment.

Any person who violates any provision of Sections 53-1-1 through 53-1-47, inclusive, or Sections 53-3-1 through 53-3-33, and 53-3-39 through 53-3-165, or any lawful rule, regulation or order of the board made hereunder, shall, in addition to any penalty for such violation that is otherwise provided for herein, be subject to a penalty of not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) per day for each day of such violation to be assessed by the board. When any charge is filed with the board charging any person with any such violation, the board shall conduct an adjudicative proceeding in accordance with the Administrative Procedures Law. Such proceeding shall be held by not less than three (3) members of the board and a unanimous verdict of all members hearing such charge shall be necessary for conviction and in the event of a conviction all members of the board hearing such cause must agree on the penalty assessed.

Except as otherwise authorized in Section 7-5-39, the Attorney General, by his designated assistant, shall represent the board in all such proceedings. If he represents the board, the Attorney General shall also designate a member of his staff to present evidence and proof of such violation in the event such charge is contested.

All penalties assessed by the board under the provisions of this section shall have the force and effect of a judgment of the circuit court and shall be enrolled in the office of the circuit clerk and execution may be issued thereon. All such penalties paid or collected shall be paid to the State Treasurer for credit to the Special Oil and Gas Board Fund.

Any person adjudged guilty of any such violation shall have the right of appeal in accordance with the provisions of Section 53-1-39.

The payment of any penalty as provided herein shall not have the effect of changing illegal oil into legal oil, illegal gas into legal gas or illegal product into legal product, nor shall such payment have the effect of authorizing the sale or purchase or acquisition or the transportation, refining, processing or handling in any other way of such illegal oil, illegal gas or illegal product.

Any person who aids or abets any other person in the violation of any provision of Sections 53-1-1 through 53-1-47, inclusive, or Sections 53-3-1 through 53-3-21, inclusive, or any rule, regulation or order made thereunder, shall be subject to the same penalties as are prescribed herein for the violation by such other person.

In determining the amount of the penalty under subsection (a), (b) or (c) of this section, the board shall consider at a minimum the following factors:

The willfulness of the violation;

Any damage to water, land or other natural resources of the state or their users;

Any cost of restoration and abatement;

Any economic benefit to the violator as a result of noncompliance;

The seriousness of the violation, including any harm to the environment and any harm to the health and safety of the public; and

Any prior violation by such violator.

The board is authorized to utilize the provisions of Section 85-7-132 to enforce penalties provided by this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-28; Laws, 1948, ch. 256, § 15; Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 24; Laws, 1989, ch. 570, § 1; Reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 357, § 24; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 340, § 24; Laws, 1997, ch. 482, § 3; Laws, 2007, ch. 325, § 2; Laws, 2012, ch. 546, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 2012.